District of Columbia statutes.
29-1012.12

Statement of termination.

(a)

A dissolved limited cooperative association that has completed winding up may deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of termination that states:

(1)

The name of the association;

(2)

The date of filing of its initial articles of organization; and

(3)

That the association is terminated.

(b)

The filing of a statement of termination shall not itself terminate the limited cooperative association.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1215 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.